North Dakota, session 69, SB2156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-09-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-09-08. School district elections - Candidate filings.
An individual seeking election to the board of a school district shall prepare and sign a
document stating the individual's name and the position for which that individual is a candidate.
A candidate shall also file a statement of interests as required by section 16.1-09-02. Whether
or not the election is held in conjunction with a statewide election, all statements of interest
must be filed with the school district business manager, or mailed to and in the possession of
the business manager, by four p.m. of the sixty-fourth day before the election. A candidate shall
also file a campaign contribution statement as required by section 16.1-08.1-02.3 16.1 - 08.2 - 03 .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-09-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-09-19. Duties of election officials - Other applicable statutes.
Sections 16.1-08.1-03.3 16.1 - 08.2 - 07 , 16.1-10-01, 16.1-10-06, 16.1-10-06.1, 16.1-10-07,
16.1-10-08, 16.1-13-22, 16.1-13-23, 16.1-13-30, 16.1-15-01, 16.1-15-04, and 16.1-16-04 apply
to elections held under sections 15.1-09-09 and 15.1-09-11.
Page No. 1 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-01-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-01-12. Election offenses - Penalty.
1. It is unlawful for an individual, measure committee as described in section
16.1-08.1-01 16.1 - 08.2 - 01 , or other organization to:
a. Fraudulently alter another individual's ballot, substitute one ballot for another, or
otherwise defraud a voter of that voter's vote.
b. Cause a disturbance, breach the peace, or obstruct a qualified elector or a
member of the election board on the way to or at a polling place.
c. Vote more than once in any election.
d. Knowingly vote in the wrong election precinct or district.
e. Disobey the lawful command of an election officer as defined in chapter 16.1-05.
f. Knowingly exclude a qualified elector from voting or knowingly allow an
unqualified individual to vote.
g. Knowingly vote when not qualified to do so.
h. Sign an initiative, referendum, recall, or any other election petition when not
qualified to do so.
i. Circulate an initiative, referendum, recall, or any other election petition not in its
entirety or when unqualified to do so.
j. Pay or offer to pay any individual, measure committee, or other organization, or
receive payment or agree to receive payment, on a basis related to the number
of signatures obtained for circulating an initiative, referendum, or recall petition.
This subsection does not prohibit the payment of salary and expenses for
circulation of the petition on a basis not related to the number of signatures
obtained, as long as the circulators file the intent to remunerate before submitting
the petitions and, in the case of initiative and referendum petitions, fully disclose
all contributions received pursuant tounder chapter 16.1-08.1 16.1 - 08.2 to the
secretary of state upon submission of the petitions. The disclosure of
contributions received under this section does not affect the requirement to file a
pre-election report by individuals or organizations soliciting or accepting
contributions for the purpose of aiding or opposing the circulation or passage of a
Page No. 2 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
statewide initiative or referendum petition or measure placed upon a statewide
ballot by action of the legislative assembly under chapter 16.1-08.1 16.1 - 08.2 . Any
signature obtained in violation of this subdivision is void and may not be counted.
k. Willfully fail to perform any duty of an election officer after having accepted the
responsibility of being an election officer by taking the oath as prescribed in this
title.
l. Willfully violate any rule adopted by the secretary of state pursuant to this title.
m. Willfully make any false canvass of votes, or make, sign, publish, or deliver any
false return of an election, knowing the canvass or return to be false; or willfully
deface, destroy, or conceal any statement or certificate entrusted to the
individual's or organization's care.
n. Destroy ballots, ballot boxes, election lists, or other election supplies except as
provided by law, or negatively impact the confidentiality, integrity, or availability of
any system used for voting.
o. Sign a name other than that individual's own name to an initiative, referendum,
recall, or any other election petition.
p. Willfully submit an initiative or referendum petition that contains one or more
fraudulent signatures.
2. a. A violation of subdivisions b, e, f, or h through l of subsection 1 is a class A
misdemeanor.
b. A violation of subdivisions a, c, d, g, or m of subsection 1 is a class C felony.
c. A violation of subdivision n of subsection 1 is a class C felony.
d. A violation of subdivision o of subsection 1 is a class A misdemeanor if an
individual signs one or two names other than the individual's own name to a
petition and is a class C felony if an individual signs more than two names other
than the individual's own name to a petition.
e. An organization, as defined in section 12.1-03-04, that violates this section is
subject to the organizational fines in section 12.1-32-01.1. The court in which the
conviction is entered shall notify the secretary of state of the conviction and shall
order the secretary of state to revoke the certificate of authority of any convicted
organization or limited liability company. The organization may not reapply to the
Page No. 3 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
secretary of state for authorization to do business under any name for one year
upon conviction of a class A misdemeanor and for five years upon conviction of a
class C felony under this section, except an organization operating a signature
gathering business, or similar enterprise, that violates subdivision p of
subsection 1, and is convicted of fraud, is subject to a class A misdemeanor and
may not reapply to the secretary of state for authorization to do business under
any name for five years following the entry of judgment.
f. A violation of subdivision p of subsection 1 by any member of a measure
committee, including an initiative or referendum sponsoring committee or an
agent acting on behalf of, or in conjunction with, a measure committee for the
purpose of collecting signatures for a petition under this chapter is subject to a
civil penalty of not more than three thousand dollars. The civil penalty may be
recovered in an action brought in the district court of Burleigh County by the
attorney general.
g. An individual who is a member of an organization may be convicted of a violation
as an accomplice under section 12.1-03-01.
3. Every act this chapter makes criminal when committed with reference to the election of
a candidate is equally criminal when committed with reference to the determination of
a question submitted to qualified electors to be decided by votes cast at an election.
SECTION 4. Chapter 16.1-08.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted
as follows:
16.1 - 08.2 - 01. Definitions .
1. "Affiliate" means an organization controlling, is controlled by, or is under common
control with another organization. For purposes of this definition, control means the
possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the
management and policies of an organization, whether through the ownership of voting
securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement
services, or otherwise. Control is presumed to exist if an organization, directly or
indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing
fifty percent or more of the voting securities of any other organization.
Page No. 4 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. "Association" means any club, association, union, brotherhood, fraternity, organization,
or group of any kind of two or more persons, including labor unions, trade
associations, professional associations, or governmental associations, which is united
for any purpose, business, or object and which assesses any dues, membership fees,
or license fees in any amount, or which maintains a treasury fund in any amount. The
term does not include corporations, cooperative corporations, limited liability
companies, political committees, or political parties.
3. "Conduit" means a person that is not a political party, political committee, or candidate
and which receives a contribution of money and transfers the contribution to a
candidate, political party, or political committee when the contribution is designated
specifically for the candidate, political party, or political committee and the person has
no discretion as to the recipient and the amount transferred. The term includes a
transactional intermediary, including a credit card company or a money transfer
service paying or transferring money to a candidate on behalf of another person.
4. "Contribution" means a gift, transfer, conveyance, provision, receipt, subscription,
loan, advance, deposit of money, or anything of value, made for the purpose of
influencing the nomination for election, or election, of any person to public office or
aiding or opposing the circulation or passage of a statewide initiative or referendum
petition or measure. The term also means a contract, promise, or agreement, express
or implied, whether or not legally enforceable, to make a contribution for any of the
above purposes. The term includes funds deposited by a candidate for public office or
a political party or committee which are transferred or signed over to that candidate,
party, or committee from another candidate, party, or political committee or other
source including a conduit. The term "anything of value" includes any good or service
of more than a nominal value. The term "nominal value" means the cost, price, or
worth of the good or service is trivial, token, or of no appreciable value. The term
"contribution" does not include:
a. A loan of money from a bank or other lending institution made in the regular
course of business.
b. Time spent by volunteer campaign or political party workers.
Page No. 5 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Money or anything of value deposited for commercial transactions, including
rents, advertising, or sponsorships made as a part of a fair market value
bargained-for exchange.
d. Money or anything of value deposited for anything other than a political purpose.
e. Products or services for which the actual cost or fair market value are reimbursed
by a payment of money.
f. An independent expenditure.
g. The value of advertising paid by a political party, multicandidate political
committee, or caucus which is in support of a candidate.
h. In-kind contributions from a candidate to the candidate's campaign.
5. "Cooperative corporations", "corporations", and "limited liability companies" are as
defined in this code, and for purposes of this chapter "corporations" includes nonprofit
corporations. However, if a political committee, the only purpose of which is accepting
contributions and making expenditures for a political purpose, incorporates for liability
purposes only, the committee is not considered a corporation for the purposes of this
chapter.
6. "Expenditure" means:
a. A gift, transfer, conveyance, provision, loan, advance, payment, distribution,
disbursement, outlay, or deposit of money or anything of value, except a loan of
money from a bank or other lending institution made in the regular course of
business, made for a political purpose or for the purpose of influencing the
passage or defeat of a measure.
b. A contract, promise, or agreement, express or implied, whether or not legally
enforceable, to make any expenditure.
c. The transfer of funds by a political committee to another political committee.
d. An independent expenditure.
7. "Expenditure purpose" means the type of expense for which expenditures for a
political purpose occurred under this chapter.
8. "Foreign national" means:
a. A government or country other than the United States.
Page No. 6 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. A political party organized under the laws of a country other than the United
States.
c. A corporation, partnership, association, organization, or other combination of
persons organized under the laws of or having its principal place of business in a
country other than the United States.
d. An individual with citizenship of a country other than the United States.
e. An individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States and is not
admitted lawfully to the United States for permanent residence.
9. "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure made for a political purpose or for
the purpose of influencing the passage or defeat of a measure if the expenditure is
made without the express or implied consent, authorization, or cooperation of, and not
in concert with or at the request or suggestion of, any candidate, committee, or
political party.
10. "Patron" means a person who owns equity interest in the form of stock, shares, or
membership or maintains similar financial rights in a cooperative corporation.
11. "Person" means an individual, partnership, political committee, association,
corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, or other organization or
group of persons.
12. "Personal benefit" means a benefit to the candidate or another person which is not for
a political purpose or related to a candidate's responsibilities as a public officeholder,
and any other benefit that would convert a contribution to personal income.
13. "Political committee" means any committee, club, association, or other group of
persons which receives contributions or makes expenditures for political purposes and
includes:
a. A political action committee not connected to another organization and free to
solicit funds from the general public, or derived from a corporation, cooperative
corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or an association
soliciting or receives contributions from its employees or members or makes
expenditures for political purposes on behalf of its employees or members;
b. A candidate committee established to support an individual candidate seeking
public office which solicits or receives contributions for political purposes;
Page No. 7 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. A political organization registered with the federal election commission, which
solicits or receives contributions or makes expenditures for political purposes;
d. A multicandidate political committee, including a caucus, established to support
multiple groups or slates of candidates seeking public office, which solicits or
receives contributions for political purposes; and
e. A measure committee, including an initiative or referendum sponsoring
committee at any stage of its organization, which solicits or receives contributions
or makes expenditures for the purpose of supporting or opposing an initiative or
referendum petition, or measure sought to be voted upon by the voters of the
state, including any activities undertaken for the purpose of drafting an initiative
or referendum petition, seeking approval of the secretary of state for the
circulation of a petition, or seeking approval of the submitted petitions.
14. "Political party" means any association, committee, or organization which nominates a
candidate for election to any office which may be filled by a vote of the electors of this
state or any of its political subdivisions and whose name appears on the election ballot
as the candidate of the association, committee, or organization.
15. "Political purpose" means any activity undertaken in support of or in opposition to the
election or nomination of a candidate to public office and includes using "vote for",
"oppose", or any similar support or opposition language in any advertisement whether
the activity is undertaken by a candidate, a political committee, a political party, or any
person. The term includes paying any expenses related to the election or nomination
of a candidate.
16. "Public office" means every office to which an individual can be elected by vote of the
people under the laws of this state.
17. "Subsidiary" means an affiliate of a corporation under the control of the corporation
directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.
18. "Ultimate and true source" means the person that knowingly contributed over
two hundred fifty dollars solely to influence a statewide election or an election for the
legislative assembly.
Page No. 8 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1 - 08.2 - 02. General provisions .
1. A political committee, except those defined in subdivision c of subsection 13 o f
section 16.1 - 08.2 - 01, shall register its name, mailing address, telephone number, and
nongovernment issued electronic mail address, and its agent's name, mailing address,
telephone number, and nongovernment issued electronic mail address, and a
designation as to whether the committee is incorporated solely for the purpose of
liability protection, with the secretary of state. A candidate who does not have a
candidate committee shall register the candidate's name, mailing address, telephone
number, and nongovernment issued electronic mail address with the secretary of
state. If the candidate has an agent, the candidate also shall register the agent's
name, mailing address, telephone number, and nongovernment issued electronic mail
address with the secretary of state.
2. The registration required under this section for a candidate or political committee that
has not previously registered with the secretary of state must be submitted within
fifteen business days of the receipt of any contribution or expenditure made.
3. A candidate or political committee required to be registered under this section must
register with the secretary of state each year during which the candidate holds public
office or during which the political committee receives contributions, makes
expenditures for political purposes, or has a balance in the campaign account. An
individual who no longer holds public office or an individual who no longer seeks public
office must register with the secretary of state each year in which contributions are
deposited, expenditures are made for political purposes, or a balance remains in the
campaign account.
4. Any statement filed with the secretary of state under this chapter must be:
a. Filed electronically within the prescribed time and in the format established by the
secretary of state. If the secretary of state does not receive a statement, an
electronic duplicate of the statement must be filed promptly upon notice by the
secretary of state of its nonreceipt. After a statement has been filed, the secretary
of state may request or accept written clarification along with an amended
statement from a candidate, political party, or political committee filing the
statement when discrepancies, errors, or omissions on the statement are
Page No. 9 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
discovered by the secretary of state, the candidate, political party, or political
committee filing the statement, or by any interested party reciting a lawful reason
for requesting clarification and an amendment be made. When requesting an
amended statement, the secretary of state shall establish a reasonable period of
time, not to exceed ten days, agreed to by the candidate, political party, or
political committee, for filing the amended statement with the secretary of state.
b. Preserved by the secretary of state for a period of ten years from the date of the
filing deadline. The statement must be considered a part of the public records of
the secretary of state's office and must be open to public inspection on the
internet.
5. In determining the amount of individual contributions from any contributor, all amounts
deposited from the same contributor during the reporting period must be aggregated to
report an overall total contribution for the purposes of the statements required by this
chapter. Contributions made separately by different persons from joint accounts are
considered separate contributions for reporting purposes.
6. In determining the amount of expenditures to any recipient, all expenditures to the
same recipient during the reporting period must be aggregated to report an overall
total expenditure for the purposes of the statements required by this chapter.
7. Contributions and expenditures which are less than two hundred fifty dollars in the
aggregate are exempt from open records requests and reported as part of aggregate
totals only.
8. In reporting a contribution deposited through a conduit, a candidate, political party, or
political committee shall list each reportable contribution identifying the person that
submitted the contribution to the conduit and provide the required information
regarding the contribution from that person rather than identifying the conduit as the
contributor.
9. A political committee organizing and registering according to federal law that makes an
independent expenditure or makes a disbursement in excess of two hundred fifty
dollars to a nonfederal candidate seeking public office, a political party, or political
committee in this state is not required to register as a political committee according to
this section if the political committee reports according to section 16.1 - 08.2 - 06 .
Page No. 10 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
10. To ensure accurate reporting and avoid commingling of campaign and personal funds,
candidates shall use dedicated campaign accounts that are separate from any
personal accounts.
11. Registration by a political committee under this section does not reserve the name for
exclusive use nor does it constitute registration of a trade name under chapter 47-25.
12. A candidate or candidate committee for county office, city office, and school district
office are exempt from registering and filing with the secretary of state. Any other
person required to file a statement under this chapter shall file the statement with the
secretary of state.
a. A candidate for city office in a city with a population under five thousand and a
candidate committee for the candidate are exempt from this chapter. A candidate
for school district office in a school district with a fall enrollment of fewer than
one thousand students and a candidate committee for the candidate are exemp t
from this chapter.
b. A candidate for county office and a candidate committee for a candidate for
county office shall file statements under this chapter with the county auditor. A
candidate for city office and a candidate committee for a candidate for city office
shall file statements under this chapter with the city auditor. A candidate for
school district office and a candidate committee for a candidate for school district
office shall file statements under this chapter with the school business manager.
16.1 - 08.2 - 03. Pre-election, supplemental, and year-end campaign disclosure
statement requirements for candidates, candidate committees, multicandidate
committees, political committees, and political parties.
1. Before a primary or special election, and before and following a general election, a
candidate or candidate committee formed on behalf of the candidate, a multicandidate
political committee, a political committee, or a political party soliciting or accepting
contributions shall file a campaign disclosure statement including all contributions and
expenditures from January first through April thirtieth before a primary election, May
first through September thirtieth before a general election, October first through
December thirty-first following a general election, and January first through the fortieth
day before a special election. A candidate whose name is not on the ballot and who is
Page No. 11 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
not seeking election through write-in votes, the candidate's candidate committee, and
a political party that has not endorsed or nominated any candidate in the election is
not required to file a statement under this subsection. The statement before a primary,
general, or special election may be submitted for filing beginning on the day following
the end of the reporting period and must be submitted before the eighth day following
the reporting period. The statement following the general election may be submitted
for filing beginning on January first and must be submitted before February first. The
statement must include:
a. For each contribution deposited during the reporting period, the:
(1) Name and the city and state of the contributor;
(2) Total amount of the contribution; and
(3) Date the last contributed amount was deposited.
b. For each expenditure during the reporting period, the:
(1) Name of the recipient and location of purchase;
(2) Total amount of the expenditure made to the recipient;
(3) Date of the expenditure; and
(4) Expenditure purpose.
c. The total of all contributions and expenditures which total in excess of
two hundred fifty dollars during the reporting period and the aggregated total o f
contributions and expenditures which are two hundred and fifty dollars or less
during the reporting period.
d. For a candidate, a candidate committee formed on behalf of a candidate, a
multicandidate committee, or a political party, the balance of the campaign fund
on the last day of the reporting period and the balance of the campaign fund on
the first day of the reporting period.
2. Beginning on the day following the end of the reporting period through the day before
the election, a person filing a statement under subsection 1 must file a supplementa l
statement within forty-eight hours of the start of the day following the deposit of a
contribution or aggregate contribution from a contributor which is in excess of five
hundred dollars. The statement must include the:
a. Name and the city and state of the contributor;
Page No. 12 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. Total amount of the contribution deposited during the reporting period; and
c. Date the last contributed amount was deposited.
3. Before February first, a candidate or candidate committee, a multicandidate political
committee, a political committee, or a political party soliciting or accepting
contributions not required to file a statement under subsection 1 shall file a campaign
disclosure statement including all contributions deposited and expenditures from
January first through December thirty-first of the previous year. The statement may be
submitted for filing beginning on January first. The statement filed according to this
section must include:
a. For a candidate, a candidate committee formed on behalf of a candidate, a
multicandidate committee, or political party, the balance of the campaign fund on
January first and on December thirty-first.
b. For each contribution deposited during the reporting period, the:
(1) Name and the city and state of the contributor;
(2) Total amount of the contribution; and
(3) Date the last contributed amount was deposited.
c. For each expenditure during the reporting period, the:
(1) Name of the recipient and location of purchase;
(2) Total amount of the expenditure made to the recipient;
(3) Date of the expenditure; and
(4) Expenditure purpose.
d. The total of all contributions and expenditures which total in excess of
two hundred fifty dollars during the reporting period .
e. The aggregated total of contributions and expenditures which are two hundred
and fifty dollars or less during the reporting period.
4. A person required to file a statement under this section shall report each aggregated
contribution from a contributor which totals five thousand dollars or more during the
reporting period. For these contributions from individuals, the statement must include
the contributor's occupation, employer, and the employer's principal place of business.
Page No. 13 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1 - 08.2 - 04. Special requirements for state political parties .
1. State political parties shall establish separate and segregated accounts for the
management of state nominating conventions. All revenue obtained and expenditures
made for the planning and running of a state convention must be accounted for in
these accounts.
2. A postconvention statement must be filed with the secretary of state sixty days after
the close of the state nominating convention. The reporting period for the
postconvention statement begins on the first day of January of the reporting year and
ends thirty days after the close of the state nominating convention.
3. A year-end statement covering the entire calendar year must be filed with the
secretary of state before February first of the following year even if no convention
revenue was deposited or expenditures made within the calendar year.
4. The statement filed under this section must show:
a. The balance of the filer's convention accounts at the start and close of the
reporting period.
b. The total of all revenue deposited and expenditures made of two hundred fifty
dollars or less.
c. The total of all revenue deposited and expenditures made in excess of
two hundred fifty dollars .
d. For revenues received and deposited, the:
(1) Name of each person providing the revenue;
(2) City and state of each person providing revenue;
(3) Date of the most recent receipt of revenue from each person providing
revenue; and
(4) The purpose or purposes for which the revenue was deposited from each
person.
e. For each expenditure made, the:
(1) Name of each person to which the expenditure was made;
(2) City and state of each person to which the expenditure was made;
(3) Date of the most recent expenditure made to each person or entity; and
Page No. 14 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(4) Purpose or purposes for which the aggregated expenditure total was
disbursed to each person or entity.
f. The total of all contributions and expenditures which total in excess of
two hundred fifty dollars during the reporting period .
g. The aggregated total of contributions and expenditures which are two hundred
and fifty dollars or less during the reporting period.
h. For each aggregated revenue from an individual which totals five thousand
dollars or more during the reporting period, the occupation, employer, and
principal place of business of the individual.
5. If a net gain from the convention is transferred to the accounts established for the
support of the nomination or election of candidates, the total transferred must be
reported as a contribution in the statements required by section 16.1 - 08.2 - 03 .
6. If a net loss from the convention is covered by a transfer from the accounts
established for the support of the nomination or election of candidates, the total
transferred must be reported as an expenditure in the statements required by section
16.1 - 08.2 - 03 .
7. A state political party or nonprofit entity affiliated with or under the control of a state
political party, which receives a donation for purchasing, maintaining, or renovating a
building, shall file a statement with the secretary of state before February first of each
calendar year. Any income or financial gain generated from a building purchased,
maintained, or renovated from donations must be deposited in the building fund and
must be disclosed when the political party or nonprofit entity files the statement
required under this section. Money in the fund may be used only by the state political
party or nonprofit entity affiliated with or under the control of a state political party for
purchasing, maintaining, or renovating a building, including the purchase of fixtures for
the building. The statement may be submitted for filing beginning on January first and
must include the:
a. Balance of the building fund on January first;
b. Name and the city and state of each donor;
c. Amount of each donation;
d. Date each donation was deposited;
Page No. 15 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
e. Name and the city and state of each recipient of an expenditure;
f. Amount of each expenditure;
g. Date each expenditure was made; and
h. Balance of the fund on December thirty-first.
16.1 - 08.2 - 05. Special requirements for statements required of persons engaged in
activities regarding ballot measures.
1. For each reportable contribution and expenditure under section 16.1 - 08.2 - 03, the
threshold for reporting is one hundred dollars for any person engaged in activities
described in subdivision e of subsection 13 of section 16.1 - 08.2 - 01 .
2. For contributions deposited from any contributor, a person engaged in activities
described in subdivision e of subsection 13 of section 16.1 - 08.2 - 01 shall include the
following information regarding each subcontributor that has stated a contribution is for
the express purpose of furthering the passage or defeat of a ballot measure in the
statements required under section 16.1 - 08.2 - 03 :
a. A designation as to whether any person contributed in excess of one hundred
dollars of the total contribution;
b. The name and the city and state of each subcontributor contributing in excess of
one hundred dollars of the total contribution;
c. The contribution amounts of each disclosed subcontributor; and
d. The occupation, employer, and address for the employer's principal place of
business of each disclosed subcontributor.
3. A measure committee which is seeking approval for an initiative or referendum shall
file a disclosure statement by the date the secretary of state approves the petition for
circulation. Thereafter, the measure committee is required to file disclosure statements
as directed by section 16.1 - 08.2 - 03 .
4. A measure committee that is seeking approval for an initiative or referendum shall file
a statement regarding its intent to compensate circulators before paying for petitions to
be circulated.
Page No. 16 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1 - 08.2 - 06. Special requirements for political committees organized and registered
under federal law.
1. A political committee organizing and registering according to federal law which makes
an independent expenditure or makes a disbursement in excess of two hundred fifty
dollars to a nonfederal candidate seeking public office or to a political party or political
committee in this state shall file a copy of that portion of the committee's federal report
detailing the independent expenditure or the disbursement made.
2. The political committee shall file a copy of the committee's federal report, and
supplementary information as necessary under this section, with the secretary of state
at the time of filing the report with the applicable federal agency. The report and
supplementary information must include the:
a. Name, city and state, and treasurer of the political committee;
b. Recipient's name and mailing address;
c. Date and amount of the independent expenditure or disbursement; and
d. Ultimate and true source of funds listed by contributor and subcontributor for any
amount over two hundred fifty dollars collected or used to make the independent
expenditure or disbursement including the:
(1) Name, city and state, and treasurer of the political committee;
(2) Total amount of the contribution; and
(3) Date the last contribution was deposited.
16.1 - 08.2 - 07. Campaign contributions by corporations, cooperative corporations ,
limited liability companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, and associations - Penalty.
1. A corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or
association may establish, administer, and solicit contributions to a separate and
segregated fund to be used for political purposes by the corporation, cooperative
corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association. It is unlawful
for:
a. The person controlling the fund to make contributions or expenditures using
money or anything of value secured by physical force, job discrimination,
financial reprisals, or the threat of those actions; or use money from dues, fees,
treasury funds, or other money required as a condition of membership in an
Page No. 17 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
association, or as a condition of employment; or use money obtained in any
commercial transaction. Moneys from fees, dues, treasury funds, or money
obtained in a commercial transaction may, however, be used to pay costs of
administration of the fund.
b. Any person soliciting an employee, stockholder, patron, board member, or
member for a contribution to the fund to fail to inform the employee or member of
the political purposes of the fund at the time of the solicitation or of the general
political philosophy intended to be advanced through committee activities.
c. Any person soliciting an employee or member for a contribution to the fund to fail
to inform the employee or member at the time of the solicitation of the right to
refuse to contribute without any reprisal.
d. Any contribution to be accepted without keeping an accurate record of the
contributor and amount contributed and of amounts expended for political
purposes.
e. Any contribution to be accepted from any person not an employee, a stockholder,
a patron, a board member or a member of the corporation, cooperative
corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association
maintaining the political action committee, except a corporation may accept a
contribution from an employee, a stockholder, a patron, a board member, or a
member of an affiliate or a subsidiary of the corporation.
f. Any expenditure made for political purposes to be reported under this section
before control of the expenditure has been released by the political action
committee except if there is a contract, a promise, or an agreement, expressed or
implied, to make the expenditure.
2. A person may not make a payment of that person's money or of another person's
money to any other person for a political purpose in any name other than that of the
person supplying the money and a person may not knowingly receive the payment nor
enter nor cause the payment to be entered in that person's account or record in any
name other than that of the person by which it actually was furnished.
3. If an officer, employee, agent, attorney, or other representative of a corporation,
cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association
Page No. 18 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
makes any contribution prohibited by this section out of corporate, cooperative
corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association funds or
otherwise violates this section, it is prima facie evidence of a violation by the
corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or
association.
4. Corporations, cooperative corporations, limited liability companies, affiliates,
subsidiaries, and associations may make expenditures and contributions for promoting
any general political philosophy or belief deemed in the best interest of the employees,
stockholders, patrons, or members of the corporation, cooperative corporation, limited
liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association other than a "political purpose" as
defined by this chapter. A corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability
company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association may not make a contribution for a political
purpose.
5. A corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or
association may make a donation of property or money to a state political party or
nonprofit entity affiliated with or under the control of a state political party for deposit in
a separate and segregated building fund.
6. A corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or
association may make an expenditure to a measure committee for the purpose of
promoting the passage or defeat of an initiated or referred measure or petition or make
an expenditure to any other person making an independent expenditure. A
corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or
association may make an independent expenditure for a political purpose, including
political advertising in support of or opposition to a candidate, political committee, or a
political party, or for the purpose of promoting passage or defeat of initiated or referred
measures or petitions. The corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability
company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association shall file a statement disclosing any
expenditure made under this subsection with the secretary of state within forty-eight
hours after making the expenditure. The statement must include:
a. The full name of the corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability
company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association;
Page No. 19 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. The complete address of the corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability
company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association;
c. The name of the recipient of the expenditure;
d. If the expenditure is related to a measure or petition, the title of the measure or
petition and whether the expenditure is made in support of or opposition to the
measure or petition;
e. If the expenditure is related to a measure, the election date on which the
measure either will appear or did appear on the ballot;
f. The amount of the expenditure;
g. The cumulative total amount of expenditures since the beginning of the calendar
year which are required to be reported under this subsection;
h. The telephone number and the printed name and signature of the individual
completing the statement, attesting to the statement being true, complete, and
correct; and
i. The date on which the statement was signed.
7. A violation of this section may be prosecuted in the county where the contribution is
made or in any county in which it has been paid or distributed.
8. It is a class A misdemeanor for an officer, director, stockholder, manager, governor ,
member, attorney, agent, or representative of any corporation, cooperative
corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association to violate this
section or to counsel or consent to any violation. Any person that solicits or knowingly
receives any contribution in violation of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor .
9. Any officer, director, stockholder, manager, governor, member, attorney, agent, or
representative who makes, counsels, or consents to the making of a contribution in
violation of this section is liable to the company, corporation, limited liability company,
affiliate, subsidiary, or association for the amount so contributed.
16.1 - 08.2 - 08. Special requirements for conduits .
A conduit transferring any contribution to a candidate, political party, or political committee
shall provide the recipient of the contribution a detailed statement listing the name and address
of each individual contributor, the amount of each contribution, and the date each contribution
was deposited. The conduit also shall include on the statement the occupation, employer, and
Page No. 20 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
principal place of business of each contributor, or the political committee if not already
registered according to state or federal law, which contributed five thousand dollars or more in
the aggregate during a reporting period applicable to the candidate, political party, or politica l
committee. The conduit shall provide the statement to the candidate, political party, or political
committee in a manner to allow the candidate, political party, or political committee to file any
statement required to be filed under this chapter.
16.1 - 08.2 - 09. General prohibitions .
1. A foreign national may not make or offer to make, directly or indirectly, a contribution
or expenditure in connection with any election.
2. A candidate, candidate committee, political party, or any other person may not solicit,
accept, or receive, directly or indirectly, a contribution from a foreign national.
3. A candidate may not use any contribution deposited by the candidate, the candidate's
candidate committee, or a multicandidate political committee to:
a. Give a personal benefit to the candidate or another person;
b. Make a loan to another person;
c. Knowingly pay more than the fair market value for goods or services purchased
for the campaign; or
d. Pay a criminal fine or civil penalty.
4. If the secretary of state has substantial reason to believe any person knowingly
violated this section, the secretary shall arrange for an audit as authorized by section
16.1 - 08.2 - 10 .
5. A person may not be excused from attending and testifying or producing any books,
papers, or other documents before any court upon any investigation, proceeding, or
trial for a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, upon the grounds that the
testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the person may tend to
incriminate or degrade the person. A person may not be prosecuted or subjected to
any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing
concerning which the person may testify or produce evidence, documentary or
otherwise. Any testimony given or produced may not be used against the person in
any criminal investigation or proceeding.
Page No. 21 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1 - 08.2 - 10. Audit by secretary of state .
1. If a substantial irregularity is evident or reasonably alleged, the secretary of state may
arrange an audit of any statement filed pursuant to this chapter, to be performed by a
certified public accountant of the filer's choice, subject to approval by the secretary of
state. If an audit of a statement arranged by the secretary of state under this
subsection reveals a violation of this chapter, the candidate, political party, political
committee, or other person filing the statement shall pay a fine to the secretary of state
equal to two hundred percent of the aggregate of contributions and expenditures
found to be in violation or an amount sufficient to pay the cost of the audit, whichever
is greater. If an audit of a statement arranged by the secretary of state under this
subsection does not reveal a violation of this chapter, the cost of the audit must be
paid for by the secretary of state.
2. If a substantial irregularity is reasonably alleged, the secretary of state may arrange an
audit of any statement filed pursuant to this chapter, performed by a certified public
accountant of the filer's choice, subject to approval by the secretary of state, upon
written request by any interested party made to the secretary of state within thirty days
following receipt of a statement by the secretary of state. The request must be made in
writing, recite a substantial irregularity and a lawful reason for requesting an audit, and
be accompanied by a bond in an amount established by the secretary of state
sufficient to pay the cost of the audit. If an audit of a statement arranged by the
secretary of state under this subsection reveals a violation of this chapter, the
candidate, political party, or political committee filing the statement shall pay a fine to
the secretary of state equal to two hundred percent of the aggregate of contributions
and expenditures found to be in violation or an amount sufficient to pay the cost of the
audit, whichever is greater, and the bond must be returned to the person submitting it.
If an audit of a statement arranged by the secretary of state under this subsection
does not reveal a violation of this chapter, the cost of the audit must be satisfied from
the bond filed with the secretary of state.
3. An audit may not be made or requested of a statement for the sole reason that it was
not timely filed with the secretary of state. An audit made or arranged according to this
section must audit only those items required to be included in any statement,
Page No. 22 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
registration, or report filed with the secretary of state according to this chapter. The
secretary of state may collect any payment obligation arising out of this section by civil
action or by assignment to a collection agency, with any costs of collection to be
added to the amount owed and to be paid by the delinquent filer. Any remaining
moneys collected by the secretary of state after an audit is paid for under this section
must be deposited in the state's general fund. This section does not apply to
statements filed by candidates or candidate committees for candidates for county, city,
or school district offices.
16.1 - 08.2 - 11. Filing officer to charge and collect filing fees .
1. If a statement or report required to be filed according to this chapter is not filed within
the prescribed time, the filing officer to whom the report was to be filed is authorized to
charge and collect a late fee as follows:
a. Within six days after the prescribed time, one hundred dollars;
b. Within thirteen days after the prescribed time, two hundred fifty dollars; and
c. Thereafter, five hundred dollars.
2. Any amendment filed by the candidate, candidate committee, multicandidate
committee, political committee, or political party, or at the request of the filing officer,
the filing officer to whom the report was to be filed is authorized to charge and collect a
late fee as follows:
a. Within six days after the filing deadline, one hundred dollars;
b. Within eleven days after the filing deadline, two hundred fifty dollars; and
c. Thereafter, five hundred dollars.
3. Any fines paid under this section must be reported on the statement filed by the
candidate, candidate committee, multicandidate committee, political committee, or
political party.
4. The filing officer may collect any payment obligation arising out of this section by civil
action or by assignment to a collection agency, with any costs of collection to be
added to the amount owed and to be paid by the delinquent filer.
Page No. 23 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1 - 08.2 - 12. Secretary of state to provide instruction and adjust thresholds for
inflation.
1. The secretary of state shall provide instructions and conduct training for the purpose of
promoting uniform application of campaign finance and disclosure requirements and
the uniform filing of statements, registrations, or reports according to this chapter.
2. The secretary of state shall adjust for inflation the reporting thresholds in this chapter
by one hundred dollars once every ten years from the last calendar year of adjustment
and inform persons submitting reports under this chapter of the adjustments. The
secretary of state shall make the adjustments beginning January first of each
adjustment year beginning January 1, 2026 .
16.1 - 08.2 - 13. Penalty .
Except as otherwise provided, any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter
is guilty of a class A misdemeanor .
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-10-04.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-10-04.1. Certain political advertisements to disclose name of sponsor - Name
disclosure requirements.
Every political advertisement by newspaper, pamphlet or folder, display card, sign, poster,
or billboard, website, or by any other similar public means, on behalf of or in opposition to any
candidate for public office, designed to assist, injure, or defeat the candidate by reflecting upon
the candidate's personal character or political action, or by a measure committee as described
in section 16.1-08.1-01 16.1 - 08.2 - 01 , or a corporation making an independent expenditure either
for or against a measure, must disclose on the advertisement the name of the person, as
defined in section 16.1-08.1-01 16.1 - 08.2 - 01 , or political party paying for the advertisement. If
the name of a political party, association, or partnership is used, the disclaimer must also
include the name of the chairman or other responsible individual from the political party,
association, or partnership. The name of the person paying for any radio or television broadcast
containing any advertising announcement for or against any candidate for public office must be
announced at the close of the broadcast. If the name of a political party, association, or
partnership is used, the disclaimer must also include the name of the chairman or other
responsible individual from the political party, association, or partnership. In every political
Page No. 24 25.0330.06000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
advertisement in which the name of the person paying for the advertisement is disclosed, the
first and last name of any named individual must be disclosed. An advertisement paid for by an
individual candidate or group of candidates must disclose that the advertisement was paid for
by the individual candidate or group of candidates. The first and last name or names of the
candidates paying for the advertisement are not required to be disclosed. This section does not
apply to campaign buttons.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Subdivision f of subsection 8 of section 51-28-01 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
f. By or on behalf of a political party, candidate, or other group with a political
purpose, as defined in section 16.1-08.1-01 16.1 - 08.2 - 01 , unless the
communication is a text message.
Page No. 25 25.0330.06000